Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; IMMIGRANT DEVELOPMENT CENTER.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116J.8731, subdivision 5, of the amount appropriated under Laws 2025 First Special Session, chapter 6, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (n), in fiscal year 2027, $3,000,000 is for a grant to the Immigrant Development Center, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to acquire, renovate, and reconstruct a building to house a cultural mall to include 75 businesses and create 140 jobs in the city of Moorhead. Grant proceeds may be used for acquisition; demolition work; improvements to, or replacement of, building systems; repairs; required site improvements; and improvements to interior spaces. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end